California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) Any person remitting amounts due pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall perform electronic funds transfer in compliance with the due dates set forth in Article 1 (commencing with Section 8751). Payment is deemed complete on the date the electronic funds transfer is initiated, if settlement to the state’s demand account occurs on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated. If settlement to the state’s demand account does not occur on or before the banking day following the date the transfer is initiated, payment is deemed to occur on the date settlement occurs.

(d) Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall, on or before the due date of the remittance, file a return for the preceding reporting period in the form and manner prescribed by the board. Any person
 who fails to timely file the required return shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of taxes with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(e) Any person required to remit taxes pursuant to this article who remits those taxes by means other than appropriate electronic funds transfer shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the taxes incorrectly remitted.

(f) Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 8801), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the tax or amount of tax, in addition to the tax or amount of tax, plus interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from
 the date on which the tax became due and payable to the state until the date of payment.

(g) In determining whether a person’s estimated tax liability averages twenty thousand dollars ($20,000) or more per month, the board may consider tax returns filed pursuant to this part and any other information in the board’s possession.

(h) The penalties imposed by subdivisions (d), (e), and (f) shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the taxes due for any one return. Any person remitting taxes by electronic funds transfer shall be subject to the penalties under this section and not Section 8876.

(i) The board shall promulgate regulations pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code for purposes of implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 519, Sec. 3.   Effective October 4, 2005.   Operative January 1, 2006, by Sec. 25 of Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

8761.

If the board finds that a person’s failure to make payment by an appropriate electronic funds transfer in accordance with board procedures is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and in the absence of willful neglect, that person shall be relieved of the penalty provided in subdivision (e) of Section 8760. Any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which he or she bases his
 or her claim for relief.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8762.

(a) “Electronic funds transfer” means any transfer of funds, other than a transaction originated by check, draft, or similar paper instrument, that is initiated through an electronic terminal, telephonic instrument, or computer or magnetic tape, so as to order, instruct, or authorize a financial institution to debit or credit an account. Electronic funds transfers shall be accomplished by an automated clearinghouse debit, an automated clearinghouse credit, or by Federal Reserve Wire Transfer (Fedwire).

(b) “Automated clearinghouse” means any federal reserve bank, or an organization established in agreement with the National Automated Clearing House Association, that operates as a clearinghouse for transmitting or receiving entries between banks or bank accounts and which authorizes an electronic transfer of funds between these banks or bank accounts.

(c) “Automated clearinghouse debit” means a transaction in which the state, through its designated depository bank, originates an automated clearinghouse transaction debiting the person’s bank account and crediting the state’s bank account for the amount of tax. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse debit transaction shall be paid by the state.

(d) “Automated clearinghouse credit” means an automated clearinghouse transaction in which the person through
 his or her own bank, originates an entry crediting the state’s bank account and debiting his or her own bank account. Banking costs incurred for the automated clearinghouse credit transaction charged to the state shall be paid by the person originating the credit.

(e) “Fedwire transfer” means any transaction originated by a person and utilizing the national electronic payment system to transfer funds through the federal reserve banks, when that person debits his or her own bank account and credits the state’s bank account. Electronic funds transfers pursuant to Section 8760 may be made by Fedwire only if payment cannot, for good cause, be made according to subdivision (a), and the use of Fedwire is preapproved by the board. Banking costs incurred for the Fedwire transaction charged to the person and to the state shall be paid by the person originating the transaction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8763.

(a) Any return, declaration, statement, or other document required to be made under this part that is filed using electronic media shall be filed and authenticated pursuant to any method or form the board may prescribe.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any return declaration, statement, or other document otherwise required to be signed that is filed by the taxpayer using electronic media in a form as required by the board shall be deemed to be a signed, valid original
 document, including upon reproduction to paper form by the board.

(c) Electronic media includes, but is not limited to, computer modem, magnetic media, optical disk, facsimile machine, or telephone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 459, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Deficiency Determinations [8776. - 8783.]

8776.

If the board is dissatisfied with the return filed, it may compute and determine the amount to be paid upon the basis of any information available to it. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount of tax due for one or for more than one month. When a business is discontinued a determination may be made at any time thereafter, within the periods specified in Section 8782, as to liability arising out of that business, irrespective of whether the determination is issued prior to the due date of the liability as otherwise specified in this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

8777.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount of the tax, or any portion thereof, should have been reported until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 26.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8778.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a month or months against underpayments for another month or months and against the interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8779.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of this part or the rules and regulations adopted under this part, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.

If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade this part or the rules and regulations adopted under this part, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount of the determination shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

8781.

The department shall give the user written notice of its determination. The notice shall be served in one of the following manners:

(a) By placing the notice in a sealed envelope, with postage paid, addressed to the user at their address as it appears in the records of the department. Service made pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of the deposit of the notice in the United States Post Office, or a mailbox, sub-post office, substation, or mail chute, or other facility maintained or provided by the United States Postal Service, without extension of time for any reason.

(b) By personally delivering the notice to the person to be served. Service made
 pursuant to this subdivision shall be deemed complete at the time of such delivery. Personal service to a corporation may be made by delivery of a notice to any person designated in the Code of Civil Procedure to be served for the corporation with summons and complaint in a civil action.

(c) (1) By delivering the notice electronically via secure transmission when either of the following applies:

(A) The taxpayer requests the notice of determination to be sent electronically via secure transmission.

(B) The department has evidence that the taxpayer no longer receives mail at the address of record and has previously provided an address for electronic mail.

(2) Service provided pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be deemed complete at the
 time the department electronically transmits the notice via the taxpayer’s secure web portal, without extension of time for any reason.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 22.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8782.

Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade the tax, or failure to make a return, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be served within three years after the last day of the calendar month following the period for which the return was due or within three years after the return is filed, whichever period expires later. If the user fails to make a return, the notice of determination shall be served within eight years after the last day of the month following the period for which the return was due.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 23.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8782.1.

In the case of a deficiency arising under this part during the lifetime of a decedent, a notice of deficiency determination shall be served within four months after written request therefor, in the form required by the department, by the fiduciary of the estate or trust or by any other person liable for the tax or any portion thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 24.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8783.

If before the expiration of the time prescribed in Section 8782 for serving a notice of deficiency determination the taxpayer has consented in writing to the service of the notice after such time, the notice may be served at any time prior to the expiration of the period agreed upon. The period so agreed upon may be extended by subsequent agreements in writing made before the expiration of the period previously agreed upon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 25.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Determinations if No Return Made [8801. - 8805.]

8801.

If any user fails to make a return, the board shall make an estimate of the amount of fuel used by the user which is subject to the tax. The estimate shall be made for the month or months in respect to which the user failed to make a return and shall be based upon any information available to the board. Upon the basis of this estimate the board shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid to the State, adding to the sum thus fixed a penalty equal to 10 percent thereof. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one month.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

In making a determination the board may offset overpayments for a month or months against underpayments for another month or months and against interest and penalties on the underpayments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the last day of the calendar month following the reporting period for which the amount, or any portion thereof, should have been reported until the date of payment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 555, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

If the failure of a user to file a return is due to fraud or an intent to evade the tax, a penalty of 25 percent of the amount required to be paid by the user, exclusive of penalties, shall be added thereto in addition to the 10-percent penalty provided in Section 8801.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 556.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

Promptly after making its determination the department shall give to the user written notice of its estimate and determination, the notice to be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 26.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Jeopardy Determinations [8826. - 8829.]

8826.

If the board believes that the collection of any amount of excise tax imposed under this part will be jeopardized by delay, it shall thereupon make a determination of the amount of tax, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount determined is immediately due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8827.

If the amount of the tax, interest, and penalty specified in the jeopardy determination is not paid within 10 days after service upon the user of notice of the determination, the determination becomes final, unless a petition for redetermination is filed within the 10 days, and the delinquency penalty and interest provided in Article 6 of this chapter shall attach to the amount specified.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 38.)
-------------------------------------------

8828.

The user against whom a jeopardy determination is made may petition for the redetermination thereof pursuant to Article 5 of this chapter. He shall, however, file the petition for redetermination with the board within 10 days after the service upon him of notice of the determination. The user shall at the time of filing the petition for redetermination deposit with the board such security as it may deem necessary to insure compliance with this part. The security may be sold by the board in the manner prescribed by Section 8951.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 752.)
-------------------------------------------

8828.5.

In accordance with such rules and regulations as the board may prescribe, the person against whom a jeopardy determination is made may apply for an administrative hearing for one or more of the following purposes:

(a) To establish that the determination is excessive; or

(b) To establish that the sale of property that may be seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination or any part thereof shall be delayed pending the administrative hearing because the sale would result in irreparable injury to the person; or

(c) To request the release of all or a part of the property to the person; or 

(d) To request a stay of collection activities.

The application shall be filed within 30 days after service of the notice of jeopardy determination and shall be in writing and state the specific factual and legal grounds upon which it is founded. No security need be posted to file the application and to obtain this hearing. However, if the person does not deposit within the 10-day period prescribed in Section 8828, such security as the board may deem necessary to ensure compliance with this part, the filing of the application shall not operate as a stay of collection activities, except sale of property seized after issuance of the jeopardy determination. Upon a showing of good cause for failure to file a timely application for administrative hearing, the board may
 allow a filing of the application and grant the person an administrative hearing. The filing of an application pursuant to this section shall not affect provisions of Section 8827 relating to the finality date of the determination or to penalty or interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

8829.

Any notice required by this article may be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 27.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Redeterminations [8851. - 8855.]

8851.

Any user against whom a determination is made under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776) or 3 (commencing with Section 8801) may petition for a redetermination within 30 days after service upon the user of notice thereof. If a petition for redetermination is not filed within the 30-day period, the determination becomes final at the expiration of the period.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 193, Sec. 115.)
-------------------------------------------

8851.5.

Every petition for redetermination shall be in writing and shall state the specific grounds upon which the petition is founded. The petition may be amended to state additional grounds at any time prior to the date on which the board issues its order or decision upon the petition for redetermination.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 881.)
-------------------------------------------

8852.

If a petition for redetermination is filed within the 30-day period, the board shall reconsider the determination and, if the user has so requested in his petition, shall grant him an oral hearing and shall give him 10 days’ notice of the time and place of the hearing. The board may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 2129.)
-------------------------------------------

8852.5.

The board may decrease or increase the amount of the determination before it becomes final, but the amount may be increased only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the board at or before the hearing. Unless the penalty imposed by Section 8780 or Section 8804 applies to the amount of the determination as originally made or as increased, the claim for increase must be asserted within eight years after the last day of the month following the month for which the return for the period for which the increase is asserted was due or within eight years after the return was filed, whichever period expires the later.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 368.)
-------------------------------------------

8853.

The order or decision of the department upon a petition for redetermination becomes final 30 days after serving of notice thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 28.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8854.

All determinations made by the board under Articles 2 or 3 of this chapter are due and payable at the time they become final. If they are not paid when due and payable, a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and penalties, shall be added thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1954, Ch. 7.)
-------------------------------------------

8855.

Any notice required by this article shall be served in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 29.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Interest and Penalties [8876. - 8880.]

8876.

(a) Any user who fails to pay any tax, except taxes determined by the board under Article 2 (commencing with Section 8776) or Article 3 (commencing with Section 8801), within the time required shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax, together with interest on that tax at the modified adjusted rate per month, or fraction thereof, established pursuant to Section 6591.5, from the date on which the tax became due and payable until the date of payment.

(b) Any
 user who fails to file a return in accordance with the due date set forth in Section 8751 or the due date established by the board in accordance with Section 8755, shall pay a penalty of 10 percent of the amount of the tax with respect to the period for which the return is required.

(c) The penalties imposed by this section shall be limited to a maximum of 10 percent of the tax for which the return is required for any one return.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 923, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

8876.5.

(a) If the department finds, taking into account all facts and circumstances, that it is inequitable to compute interest at the modified adjusted rate per month or fraction thereof, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 6591.5, interest shall be computed at the modified adjusted daily rate from the date on which the tax was due until the date of payment, if all of the following occur:

(1) The payment of tax was made one business day after the date the tax was due.

(2) The person was granted relief from all penalties that applied to that payment of tax.

(3) The person files a request for an adjustment.

(b) For purposes of this section, “modified adjusted daily rate” means the modified adjusted rate per annum as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 6591.5 determined on a daily basis by dividing the modified adjusted rate per annum by 365.

(c) For purposes of this section, “business day” means any day other than a Saturday, Sunday, or any day designated as a state holiday.

(d) This section shall not apply to any payment made pursuant to a deficiency determination, a determination where no return has been filed, or a jeopardy determination issued by the
 department.

(e) This section shall only apply to electronic payments of taxes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 432, Sec. 17.   (SB 824)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8877.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to reasonable cause and circumstances beyond the person’s control, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the penalty provided by Sections 8760, 8801, 8854, and 8876.

(b) Except as provided in subdivisions (c) or (d), any person seeking to be relieved of the penalty shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant
 relief of the penalty for any person in an area identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(d) The department shall establish criteria that provide for efficient resolution of requests for relief pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 19.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8878.

(a) If the department finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment was due to a disaster, and occurred notwithstanding the exercise of ordinary care and the absence of willful neglect, the person may be relieved of the interest provided by Sections 8754, 8760, 8803, and 8876.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), any person seeking to be relieved of the interest shall file with the department a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts upon which the person bases the claim for relief.

(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2), the department may grant relief of the interest for any person in an area
 identified in a state of emergency proclamation made by the Governor for the period the state of emergency proclamation is effective, regardless of whether the person has filed a statement with the department pursuant to subdivision (b). 

(2) The department may grant the relief in paragraph (1) only during the first 12 months following the issuance of the state of emergency proclamation or the duration of the state of emergency, whichever is less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 474, Sec. 20.   (SB 1496)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

8878.5.

(a) The board, in its discretion, may relieve all or any part of the interest imposed on a person by this part where the failure to pay tax is due in whole or in part to an unreasonable error or delay by an employee of the board acting in his or her official capacity.

(b) For purposes of this section, an error or delay shall be deemed to have occurred only if no significant aspect of the error or delay is attributable to an act of, or a failure to act by, the
 taxpayer.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board a statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based and any other information which the board may require.

(d) The board may grant relief only for interest imposed on tax liabilities that arise during taxable periods commencing on or after January 1, 2000.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

8879.

(a) If the board finds that a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment is due to the person’s reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, the person may be relieved of the taxes imposed by this part and any penalty or interest thereto.

(b) For purposes of this section, a person’s failure to make a timely return or payment shall be considered to be due to reasonable reliance on written advice from the board, only if the board finds that all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The person requested in writing that the board advise him or her whether a particular activity or transaction is subject to tax under this part. The specific facts and circumstances of the activity or transaction shall be fully described in the request.

(2) The board responded in writing to the person regarding the written request for advice, stating whether or not the described activity or transaction is subject to tax, or stating the conditions under which the activity or transaction is subject to tax.

(3) The liability for taxes applied to a particular activity or transaction which occurred before either of the following:

(A) Before the board rescinded or modified the advice so given, by sending written notice to the person of rescinded or modified advice.

(B) Before a change in statutory or constitutional law, a change in the board’s regulations, or a final decision of a court, which renders the board’s earlier written advice no longer valid.

(c) Any person seeking relief under this section shall file with the board all of the following:

(1) A copy of the person’s written request to the board and a copy of the board’s written advice.

(2) A statement under penalty of perjury setting forth the facts on which the claim for relief is based.

(3) Any other information which the board may require.

(d) Only the person making the written request shall be entitled to rely on the board’s
 written advice to that person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 987, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

8880.

(a) Under regulations prescribed by the board, if: (1) A tax liability under this part was understated by a failure to file a return required to be filed under this part, by the omission of an amount properly includable therein, or by erroneous deductions or credits claimed on a return, and the understatement of tax liability is
 attributable to one spouse; or any amount of the tax reported on a return was unpaid and the nonpayment of the reported tax liability is attributable to one spouse. (2) The other spouse establishes that he or she did not know of, and had no reason to know of, that understatement or nonpayment. (3) Taking into account whether or not the other spouse significantly benefited directly or indirectly from the understatement or the nonpayment and taking into account all other facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse liable for the deficiency in tax attributable to that understatement or nonpayment,then the other spouse shall be relieved of liability for tax (including
 interest, penalties, and other amounts) to the extent that the liability is attributable to that understatement or nonpayment of tax.

(b) For purposes of this section, the determination of the spouse to whom items of understatement or nonpayment are attributable shall be made without regard to community property laws.

(c) This section shall apply to all calendar quarters subject to the provisions of this part, but shall not apply to any calendar quarter that is more than five years from the final date on the board-issued determination, five years from the return due date for nonpayment on a return, or one year from the first contact with the spouse making a claim under this section; or that has been closed by res judicata, whichever is later.

(d) For purposes of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a), “reason to know”
 means whether or not a reasonably prudent person would have had reason to know of the understatement or nonpayment.

(e) For purposes of this section, with respect to a failure to file a return or an omission of an item from the return, “attributable to one spouse” may be determined by whether a spouse rendered substantial service as a user using taxable fuel or a vendor selling taxable fuel to which the understatement is attributable. If neither spouse rendered substantial services as a user or a vendor, then the attribution of applicable items of understatement shall be treated as community property. An erroneous deduction or credit shall be attributable to the spouse who caused that deduction or credit to be entered on the return.

(f) Under procedures prescribed by the board, if, taking into account all the facts and circumstances, it is inequitable to hold the other spouse
 liable for any unpaid tax or any deficiency (or any portion of either) attributable to any item for which relief is not available under subdivision (a), the board may relieve the other spouse of that liability.

(g) For purposes of this section, registered domestic partners, as defined in Section 297 of the Family Code, have the same rights, protections, and benefits as provided by this section, and are subject to the same responsibilities, obligations, and duties as imposed by this section, as are granted to and imposed upon spouses.

(h) The relief provided by this section shall apply retroactively to liabilities arising prior to the effective date of this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 342, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2008.   Section applicable retroactively as prescribed in subd. (h) and clarified in Sec. 60 of Ch. 342.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Collection of Tax [8951. - 9036.]



  ARTICLE 1. Security for Tax [8951. - 8958.]

8951.

The department, whenever it deems it necessary to ensure compliance with this part or any rule or regulation adopted under this part, may require any user or vendor to deposit with it any security that it may determine. Any security in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks and savings and loan institutions shall be held by the department in trust to be used solely in the manner provided for by this section and Section 8956. The department may sell the security at public sale if it becomes necessary in order to recover any amount due under this part. Notice of the sale may be served upon the person who deposited the security in the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination. Upon any sale, any surplus above the amount due shall be returned to the person who
 deposited the security.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 499, Sec. 30.   (SB 1528)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

8952.

If any user is delinquent in the payment of any obligation imposed under this part, or in the event a determination has been made against such a user which remains unpaid, the board may, not later than three years after the payment becomes delinquent, or within 10 years after the last recording or filing of a notice of state tax lien under Section 7171 of the Government Code, give notice thereof, personally or by first-class mail to all persons, including any officer or department of the state or any political subdivision or agency of the state, having in their possession or under their control any credits or other personal property belonging to the
 user, or owing any debts to the user. In the case of any state officer, department or agency, the notice shall be given to such officer, department or agency prior to the time it presents the claim of the delinquent taxpayer to the State Controller.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1980, Ch. 600, Sec. 27.)
-------------------------------------------

8953.

After receiving the notice the persons so notified shall neither transfer nor make any other disposition of the credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession or under their control at the time they receive the notice until the board consents to a transfer or disposition or until 60 days elapse after the receipt of the notice, whichever period expires the earlier.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 555.)
-------------------------------------------

8954.

All persons so notified shall forthwith after receipt of the notice advise the board of all credits, other personal property, or debts in their possession, under their control, or owing by them. If such notice seeks to prevent the transfer or other disposition of a deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice to be effective shall state the amount, interest and penalty due from the person and shall be delivered or mailed to the branch or office of such bank at which such deposit is carried or at which such credits or personal property is held. Notwithstanding any other provision, with respect to a
 deposit in a bank or other credits or personal property in the possession or under the control of a bank, the notice shall only be effective with respect to an amount not in excess of two times the amount, interest and penalty due from the person.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 103.)
-------------------------------------------

8955.

If, during the effective period of the notice to withhold, any person so notified makes any transfer or disposition of the property or debts required to be withheld, to the extent of the value of the property or the amount of the debts thus transferred or paid, he shall be liable to the State for any indebtedness due under this part from the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given if solely by reason of such transfer or disposition the State is unable to recover the indebtedness of the person with respect to whose obligation the notice was given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 555.)
-------------------------------------------

8956.

If, at the time a person ceases to be a user or vendor under this part, the board holds security pursuant to Section 8951 in the form of cash, government bonds, or insured deposits in banks or savings and loan institutions, the security when applied to the account of the taxpayer shall be deemed to be a payment on account of any liability of the taxpayer to the board on the date the person ceases to be a user or vendor under this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 912, Sec. 11.   Effective September 28, 1994.   Operative July 1, 1995, by Sec. 26 of Ch. 912.)
-------------------------------------------

8957.

(a) Subject to the limitations in subdivisions (b) and (c), the department may by notice of levy, served personally, by first-class mail, or by electronic transmission or other electronic technology, require all persons having in their possession, or under their control, any payments, credits other than payments, or other personal property belonging to a user, vendor, or other person liable for any amount under this part to withhold from those credits or other personal property the amount of any tax, interest, or penalties due from that user, vendor, or other person, or the amount of any liability incurred by them under this part, and to transmit the amount withheld to the department at those times as it may designate. The notice of levy shall have the same effect as a levy pursuant to a
 writ of execution except for the continuing effect of the levy, as provided in subdivision (b).

(b) The person served shall continue to withhold pursuant to the notice of levy until the amount specified in the notice, including accrued interest, has been paid in full, until the notice is withdrawn, or until one year from the date the notice is received, whichever occurs first.

(c) The amount required to be withheld is the lesser of the following:

(1) The amount due stated on the notice.

(2) The sum of both of the following:

(A) The amount of the payments, credits other than payments, or personal property described above and under the person’s possession or control when the notice of levy
 is served on the person.

(B) The amount of each payment that becomes due following service of the notice of levy on the person and prior to the expiration of the levy.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the term “payments” does not include earnings as that term is defined in subdivision (a) of Section 706.011 of the Code of Civil Procedure or funds in a deposit account as defined in paragraph (29) of subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code. The term “payments” does include any of the following:
